Utah statutes.
78B-1-126.   Jurors and witnesses -- Purchase of certificate forbidden --
Penalty.
(1)  No person connected officially with any of the district courts of this
state, and no state, district, county or precinct officer, shall purchase or
cause to be purchased any certificate issued to any juror or witness under the
provisions of this title.
(2)  Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
